Utah statutes.
29-1-3.   Other personal property -- Limitation of liability.

(1)  The liability of a person who is an innkeeper, hotel keeper, boarding or lodging house keeper, for loss of or injury to personal property placed in the person's care by the person's guests other than that described in Section 29-1-1, shall be that of a depositary for hire.

(2)  The liability described in Subsection (1) may not exceed $150 for each trunk and its contents, $50 for each valise, suitcase or other piece of hand luggage and its contents, and $10 for each box, bundle or package, and its contents, so placed in the person's care, unless the person has consented in writing with the guest to assume a greater liability.

